California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) On and after July 1, 2019, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the board shall require a licensee to provide a separate disclosure that includes the licensee’s probation status, the length of the probation, the probation end date, all practice restrictions placed on the licensee by the board, the board’s telephone number, and an explanation of how the patient can find further information on the licensee’s probation on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information Internet Web site, to a patient or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate before the patient’s first visit following the probationary order while the licensee is on probation pursuant to a probationary order made on
 and after July 1, 2019.

(b) A licensee required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) shall obtain from the patient, or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate, a separate, signed copy of that disclosure.

(c) A licensee shall not be required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) if any of the following applies:

(1) The patient is unconscious or otherwise unable to comprehend the disclosure and sign the copy of the disclosure pursuant to subdivision (b) and a guardian or health care surrogate is unavailable to comprehend the disclosure and sign the copy.

(2) The visit occurs in an emergency room or an urgent care facility
 or the visit is unscheduled, including consultations in inpatient facilities.

(3) The licensee who will be treating the patient during the visit is not known to the patient until immediately prior to the start of the visit.

(4) The licensee does not have a direct treatment relationship with the patient.

(d) On and after July 1, 2019, the board shall provide the following information, with respect to licensees on probation and licensees practicing under probationary licenses, in plain view on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information Internet Web site.

(1) For probation imposed pursuant to a stipulated settlement, the causes
 alleged in the operative accusation along with a designation identifying those causes by which the licensee has expressly admitted guilt and a statement that acceptance of the settlement is not an admission of guilt.

(2) For probation imposed by an adjudicated decision of the board, the causes for probation stated in the final probationary order.

(3) For a licensee granted a probationary license, the causes by which the probationary license was imposed.

(4) The length of the probation and end date.

(5) All practice restrictions placed on the license by the board.

(e) A violation of this section shall
 not be punishable as a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 570, Sec. 7.   (SB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4963.

Whenever any person has engaged in an act or practice which constitutes an offense against this chapter, a superior court of a county on application of the board may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The board may commence action in such superior court under the provisions of this section on its own motion and no undertaking shall be required in any action commenced by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4964.

The provisions of this article insofar as they are substantially the same as provisions relating to the same subject matter of any previous acupuncture licensure law shall be construed as a restatement and continuation thereof, and not as a new enactment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Renewal [4965. - 4969.]

4965.

(a) Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall expire on the last day of the birth month of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term, if not renewed.

(b) The board shall establish and administer a birth date renewal program.

(c) To renew an unexpired license, the holder shall apply for renewal on a form provided by the board and pay the renewal fee fixed by the board.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 983, Sec. 19) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4966.

Except as provided in Section 4969, a license that has expired may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration by filing of an application for renewal on a form provided by the board, paying all accrued and unpaid renewal fees, and providing proof of completing continuing education requirements. If the license is not renewed prior to its expiration, the acupuncturist, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the prescribed delinquency fee. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date the delinquency fee is paid, whichever occurs last. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in Section 4965, after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire and become invalid if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4967.

A person who fails to renew his or her license within three years after its expiration may not renew it, and it may not be restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but that person may apply for and obtain a new license if he or she meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Takes and passes the examination, if any, which would be required of him or her if an initial application for licensure was being made, or otherwise establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest, he or she is qualified to practice as an acupuncturist.

(c) Pays all of the fees that would be required if an initial application for licensure was being made. The board may provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of an examination fee in those cases in which a license is issued without an examination pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4969.

(a) A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but the renewal does not entitle the acupuncturist, while the license remains suspended, and until it is reinstated, to engage in the practice of acupuncture, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(b) A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the former licensee, as a condition to reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the license was reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its expiration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 181.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [4970. - 4974.]

4970.

The amount of fees prescribed for licensed acupuncturists shall be those set forth in this section unless a lower fee is fixed by the board in accordance with Section 4972:

(a) The application fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and may be increased to not more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

(b) The application fee for foreign applicants shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(c) The examination and reexamination fees shall be eight hundred dollars ($800).

(d) The initial license fee shall be five hundred
 dollars ($500), except that if the license will expire less than one year after its issuance, then the initial license fee shall be an amount equal to 50 percent of the initial license fee. The initial license fee shall include one wall license registration if a place of practice is specified in the application.

(e) The renewal fee shall be five hundred dollars ($500) and may be increased to not more than seven hundred seventy-five dollars ($775) and, if a lower fee is fixed by the board, shall be an amount sufficient to support the functions of the board in the administration of this chapter. The board shall assess the renewal fee biennially.

(f) The delinquency fee shall be set in accordance with Section 163.5.

(g) The wall license fee shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(h) The wall license renewal fee shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(i) If a pocket license is lost or destroyed, the pocket license replacement fee is fifty dollars ($50).

(j) The endorsement fee is one hundred dollars ($100).

(k) If a wall license is lost or destroyed, the wall license replacement fee is fifty dollars ($50).

(l) The approval fee for each provider of continuing education shall be five hundred dollars ($500) and may be increased to not more than seven hundred dollars ($700).

(m) The biennial renewal approval fee for each provider of continuing education shall be five hundred dollars ($500) and may be increased to
 not more than seven hundred dollars ($700).

(n) (1) Fees for continuing education course applications shall be assessed to the continuing education provider at a floor of ten dollars ($10) per hour of continuing education requested to offer, and a cap of twenty dollars ($20) per hour of continuing education requested to offer, allowing up to a maximum of 50 hours to be approved per course application.

(2) Fees for course hours shall be prorated in one-half hour increments.

(3) An approved course may be offered for a period of one year from the date of board course approval.

(o) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 308, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2020, Ch. 359, Sec. 5.   (AB 3330)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4971.

(a) The amount of fees prescribed for acupuncture tutorial programs shall be as follows:

(1) The application and registration fee to supervise an acupuncture trainee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and may be increased to not more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(2) The annual renewal fee for approval to supervise an acupuncture trainee shall be two hundred ($200) and may be increased to not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(3) The application fee for an acupuncture trainee shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) and may be increased to not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(4) The annual renewal fee for an acupuncture trainee shall be five hundred dollars ($500) and may be increased to not more than six hundred dollars ($600).

(5) The delinquency fee for a supervisor shall be set in accordance with Section 163.5.

(6) The delinquency fee for an acupuncture trainee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and may be increased to not more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 359, Sec. 7.   (AB 3330)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Section operative January 1, 2021, by it s own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4972.

Fees fixed by the board shall be set forth in regulations duly adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4974.

The board shall report to the Controller at the beginning of each month for the month preceding the amount and source of all revenue received by it pursuant to this chapter, and shall pay the entire amount thereof to the Treasurer for deposit in the Acupuncture Fund, which fund is created to carry out the provisions of this chapter, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 667, Sec. 7.   (AB 2190)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Acupuncture Corporations [4975. - 4979.]

4975.

An acupuncture corporation is a corporation which is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are acupuncturists are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, this article and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to that corporation and the conduct of its affairs.

With respect to an acupuncture corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the Acupuncture Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4976.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 2.2.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

4977.

An acupuncture corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under Article 4 (commencing with Section 4955). In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by statutes and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4977.1.

The income of an acupuncture corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder or his or her shares in the acupuncture corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 2.2.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

4977.2.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of an acupuncture corporation, except an assistant secretary and an assistant treasurer, shall be a licensed person as defined by Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 714, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4978.

The name of an acupuncture corporation and any name or names under which it may render professional services shall contain words “acupuncture” or “acupuncturist” and wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 2.2.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

4979.

The board may adopt and enforce regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including, but not limited to, regulations requiring (a) that the bylaws of an acupuncture corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of the corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the corporation within the time the regulations may provide, and (b) that an acupuncture corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Licensed Marriage and Family Therapists [4980. - 4989.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regulation [4980. - 4980.81.]

4980.

(a) (1) Many California families and many individual Californians are experiencing difficulty and distress and are in need of wise, competent, caring, compassionate, and effective counseling in order to enable them to improve and maintain healthy family relationships.

(2) Healthy individuals and healthy families and healthy relationships are inherently beneficial and crucial to a healthy society and are our most precious and valuable natural resource. Licensed marriage and family therapists provide a crucial support for the well-being of the people and the State of California.

(b) A person shall not engage in the practice of marriage and family therapy, as defined by Section
 4980.02, unless the person holds a valid license as a marriage and family therapist pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a person shall not do either of the following without a license obtained pursuant to this chapter.

(1) Advertise that the person performs the services of a marriage, family, child, domestic, or marital consultant.

(2) Use the titles listed in paragraph (1) or any similar titles, including the letters “L.M.F.T.,” “M.F.T.,” or “M.F.C.C.,” or another name, word, initial, or symbol in connection with or following the person’s name to imply that the person performs the services suggested by those titles.

(d) (1) A person licensed under Article 4 (commencing with Section 4996) of Chapter
 14 or under Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) may engage in the practice of marriage and family therapy and advertise that the person practices marriage and family therapy.

(2) A person described in paragraph (1) shall not advertise that the person holds the marriage and family therapist’s license, including by using the letters “L.M.F.T.,” “M.F.T.,” or “M.F.C.C.,” or another name, word, initial, or symbol in connection with or following the person’s name to imply licensure as a marriage and family therapist, unless the person is licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 640, Sec. 1.   (AB 232)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.01.

(a) This chapter shall not be construed to constrict, limit, or withdraw the Medical Practice Act, the Clinical Social Worker Practice Act, the Nursing Practice Act, the Licensed Professional Clinical Counselor Act, or the Psychology Licensing Law.

(b) This chapter shall not apply to any priest, rabbi, or minister of the gospel of any religious denomination when performing counseling services as part of their pastoral or professional duties, or to any person who is admitted to practice law in the state, or a physician and surgeon who provides counseling services as part of their professional practice.

(c) This
 chapter shall not apply to an unlicensed or unregistered employee or volunteer working in a governmental entity, a school, a college, a university, or an institution that is both nonprofit and charitable if both of the following apply:

(1) The work of the employee or volunteer is performed under the oversight and direction of the entity.

(2) (A) On and after July 1, 2020, the employee or volunteer provides a client, prior to initiating psychotherapy services or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, a notice written in at least 12-point type that is in substantially the following form:

NOTICE TO CLIENTS

The (name of office or
 unit) of the (name of agency) receives and responds to complaints regarding the practice of psychotherapy by any unlicensed or unregistered practitioner providing services at (name of agency). To file a complaint, contact (telephone number, email address, internet website, or mailing address of agency).

The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided by individuals licensed and registered by the board. If you have a complaint and are unsure if your practitioner is licensed or registered, please contact the Board of Behavioral Sciences at 916-574-7830 for assistance or utilize the board’s online license verification feature by visiting www.bbs.ca.gov.
(B) The delivery of the notice described in subparagraph
 (A) to the client shall be documented.

(d) A marriage and family therapist licensed under this chapter is a licentiate for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 805, and thus is a health care provider subject to the
 provisions of Section 2290.5 pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), all persons registered as associates or licensed under this chapter shall not be exempt from this chapter or the jurisdiction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 51.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.02.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, the practice of marriage and family therapy shall mean the application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories, principles, and methods in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, or groups in order to assess, evaluate, and treat relational issues, emotional disorders, behavioral problems, mental illness, alcohol and substance use, and to modify intrapersonal and interpersonal behaviors.

(b) The application of marriage and family therapy principles and methods includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Assessment, evaluation, and prognosis.

(2) Treatment, planning,
 and evaluation.

(3) Individual, relationship, family, or group therapeutic interventions.

(4) Relational therapy.

(5) Psychotherapy.

(6) Client education.

(7) Clinical case management.

(8) Consultation.

(9) Supervision.

(10) Use, application, and integration of the coursework and training required by Sections 4980.36, 4980.37, and 4980.41, as applicable.

(c) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision do not
 constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law. It is the intent of the Legislature that these amendments shall not be construed to expand or constrict the existing scope of practice of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 22.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.03.

(a) “Board,” as used in this chapter, means the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(b) “Associate,” as used in this chapter, means an unlicensed person who has earned a master’s or doctoral degree qualifying the person for licensure and is registered with the board as an associate.

(c) “Trainee,” as used in this chapter, means an unlicensed person who is currently enrolled in a master’s or doctoral degree program, as specified in Sections 4980.36 and 4980.37, that is designed to qualify the person for licensure under this chapter, and who has completed no less than 12 semester units or 18 quarter units of coursework in
 any qualifying degree program.

(d) “Applicant for licensure,” as used in this chapter, means an unlicensed person who has completed the required education and required hours of supervised experience for licensure.

(e) “Advertising,” as used in this chapter, includes, but is not limited to, any public communication, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 651, the issuance of any card, sign, or device to any person, or the causing, permitting, or allowing of any sign or marking on, or in, any building or structure, or in any newspaper, magazine, directory, or any printed matter whatsoever, with or without any limiting qualification. Signs within religious buildings or notices in bulletins from a religious organization mailed to a congregation are not advertising within the meaning of
 this chapter.

(f) “Experience,” as used in this chapter, means experience in interpersonal relationships, psychotherapy, marriage and family therapy, direct clinical counseling, and nonclinical practice that satisfies the requirements for licensure as a marriage and family therapist.

(g) “Supervisor,” as used in this chapter, means an individual who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has held an active license for at least two years within the five-year period immediately preceding any supervision as any of the following:

(A) A licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter
 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), licensed clinical social worker, licensed educational psychologist, or equivalent out-of-state license. A licensed educational psychologist may only supervise the provision of educationally related mental health services that are consistent with the scope of practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.

(B) A physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology or an out-of-state licensed physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology.

(2) For at least two years within the five-year period immediately preceding any supervision, has practiced psychotherapy, provided
 psychological counseling pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4989.14, or provided direct clinical supervision of psychotherapy performed by marriage and family therapist trainees, associate marriage and family therapists, associate professional clinical counselors, or associate clinical social workers. Supervision of psychotherapy performed by a social work intern or a professional clinical counselor trainee shall be accepted if the supervision provided is substantially equivalent to the supervision required for registrants.

(3) Has received training in supervision as specified in this chapter and by regulation.

(4) Has not provided therapeutic services to the supervisee.

(5) Has
 and maintains a current and active license that is not under suspension or probation as one of the following:

(A) A marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, clinical social worker, or licensed educational psychologist, issued by the board.

(B) A psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900).

(C) A physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology.

(6) Is not a spouse, domestic partner, or relative of the supervisee.

(7) Does not currently have or previously had a personal, professional, or
 business relationship with the supervisee that undermines the authority or effectiveness of the supervision.

(h) “Client centered advocacy,” as used in this chapter, includes, but is not limited to, researching, identifying, and accessing resources, or other activities, related to obtaining or providing services and supports for clients or groups of clients receiving psychotherapy or counseling services.

(i) “Accredited,” as used in this chapter, means a school, college, or university accredited by either the Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and Family Therapy Education or a regional or national institutional accrediting agency that is recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(j) “Approved,” as used
 in this chapter, means a school, college, or university that possessed unconditional approval by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at the time of the applicant’s graduation from the school, college, or university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 52.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.04.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Licensed Marriage and Family Therapist Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 24.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.05.

The settings described in Section 4980.01 are exempt settings and do not fall under the jurisdiction of this chapter or the board except as specified in Section 4980.01, and with the following exceptions:

(a) Any individual working or volunteering in an exempt setting who is licensed or registered under this chapter shall fall under the jurisdiction of the board and is not exempt from this chapter.

(b) An entity that is licensed or certified by a government regulatory agency to provide health care services shall not be considered an exempt setting unless it directly meets the criteria described in Section
 4980.01.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.06.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Nonexempt setting” means any type of setting that does not qualify as an exempt setting, as specified in Section 4980.01.

(2) “Private practice” means a type of nonexempt setting that meets all of the following: 

(A) The practice is owned by a health professional who is licensed under this division either independently or jointly with one or more other health professionals who are licensed under this division. 

(B) The
 practice provides clinical mental health services, including psychotherapy, to clients. 

(C) One or more licensed health professionals are responsible for the practice and for the services provided and set conditions of client payment or reimbursement for the provision of services.

(3) “Professional corporation” means a type of nonexempt setting and private practice that has been formed pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(b) An active license or registration number shall be required to engage in the practice of marriage and family therapy, as defined in Section 4980.02, in nonexempt settings at all times with the following exceptions:

(1) A trainee may engage in the practice of marriage and family therapy in a nonexempt setting that is not a private practice or a professional corporation while they are gaining supervised experience that meets the requirements of this chapter under the jurisdiction and supervision of their school as specified in Section 4980.42.

(2) An applicant for registration as an associate may engage in the practice of marriage and family therapy in a nonexempt setting that is not a private practice or a professional corporation before the registration number is issued if they are in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 4980.43 and are gaining supervised experience that meets the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.08.

(a) The title “licensed marriage, family and child counselor” or “marriage, family and child counselor” is hereby renamed “licensed marriage and family therapist” or “marriage and family therapist,” respectively. Any reference in any statute or regulation to a “licensed marriage, family and child counselor” or “marriage, family and child counselor” shall be deemed a reference to a “licensed marriage and family therapist” or “marriage and family therapist.”

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand or constrict the scope of practice of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(c) This section shall become operative July 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.09.

(a) (1) The title “marriage and family therapist intern” or “marriage and family therapist registered intern” is hereby renamed “associate marriage and family therapist” or “registered associate marriage and family therapist,” respectively. Any reference in statute or regulation to a “marriage and family therapist intern” or “marriage and family therapist registered intern” shall be deemed a reference to an “associate marriage and family therapist” or “registered associate marriage and family therapist.”

(2) Any reference in this chapter to the term “intern” means “associate.” Any reference in statute or regulation to the abbreviation “MFTI” means an
 “AMFT.”

(b) This section shall not be construed to expand or constrict the scope of practice of a person licensed or registered pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 4.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.10.

A person engages in the practice of marriage and family therapy when he or she performs or offers to perform or holds himself or herself out as able to perform this service for remuneration in any form, including donations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 148, Sec. 1.   (SB 274)   Effective August 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.11.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4980, a person who holds a license in another jurisdiction of the United States as a marriage and family therapist may provide marriage and family therapy services in this state for a period not to exceed 30 consecutive days in any calendar year, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The license from another jurisdiction is at the highest level for independent clinical practice in the jurisdiction in which the license was granted.

(2) The license from another jurisdiction is current, active, and unrestricted.

(3) The client is located in California during the time the person seeks to provide care in California.

(4) The client is a current client of the person and has an established, ongoing client-provider relationship with the person at the time the client became located in California.

(5) The person informs the client of the limited timeframe of the services and that the person is not licensed in California.

(6) The person provides the client with the Board of Behavioral Sciences’ internet website address.

(7) The person informs the client of the jurisdiction in which the person is licensed and the type of license held and provides the client with the person’s
 license number.

(b) A person who intends to provide marriage and family therapy services pursuant to this section shall provide the board with all of the following information before providing services:

(1) The name under which the person is licensed in another jurisdiction, the person’s mailing address, the person’s phone number, the person’s social security number or individual taxpayer identification number, and the person’s electronic mailing address, if the person has an electronic mailing address.

(2) The jurisdiction in which the person is licensed, the type of license held, and the license number.

(3) The date on which the person will begin providing marriage
 and family therapy services to the person’s client in California.

(c) A person who provides services pursuant to this section shall submit a signed statement, under penalty of perjury, acknowledging that they are subject to the jurisdiction of the board and agreeing to be bound by the laws of this state.

(d) This section does not apply to any person licensed by the board whose license has been suspended or revoked.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 53.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.30.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, a person shall not practice, or advertise the performance of, marriage and family therapy services unless the person has applied to the board for a license, paid the license fee required by this chapter, and obtained a license from the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 640, Sec. 3.   (AB 232)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.31.

A licensee shall display their license in a conspicuous place in the licensee’s primary place of practice when rendering professional clinical services in person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 1.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.32.

(a) A licensee or registrant shall provide a client with a notice written in at least 12-point type prior to initiating psychotherapy services, or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, that reads as follows: 

NOTICE TO CLIENTS

The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided within the scope of practice of marriage and family therapists. You may contact the board online at www.bbs.ca.gov, or by calling (916) 574-7830.

(b) On and after July 1, 2025,
 upon initiation of psychotherapy services with a client, the notice described in subdivision (a) shall also include the licensee’s or registrant’s full name as filed with the board, the license or registration number, the type of license or registration, and the license or registration expiration date. 

(c) Delivery of the notice required by this section to the client shall be documented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 2.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.34.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the board employ its resources for each and all of the following functions:

(a) The licensing of marriage and family therapists, clinical social workers, professional clinical counselors, and educational psychologists.

(b) The development and administration of licensing examinations and examination procedures, as specified, consistent with prevailing standards for the validation and use of licensing and certification tests. Examinations shall measure knowledge and abilities demonstrably important to the safe, effective practice of the profession.

(c) Enforcement of laws designed to protect the public from incompetent, unethical, or unprofessional practitioners.

(d) Consumer education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 25.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.35.

(a) The Legislature acknowledges that the basic obligation to provide a complete and accurate application for a marriage and family therapist license lies with the applicant. At the same time, the Legislature recognizes that an effort should be made by the board to ensure that persons who enter degree programs and supervisorial training settings that meet the requirements of this chapter are enabled to discern the requirements for licensing and to take the examination when they have completed their educational and experience requirements.

(b) In order that the board, the educational institutions, and the supervisors who monitor the education and experience of applicants may develop greater cooperation, the board shall do all of the following:
